North Carolina, session 2025, SB258.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE AND INTRODUCTION

TITLE OF ACT
SECTION 1.1. This act shall be known as the "Current Operations Appropriations
Act of 2025."

INTRODUCTION
SECTION 1.2. The appropriations made in this act are for maximum amounts
necessary to provide the services and accomplish the purposes described in the budget in
accordance with the State Budget Act. Savings shall be effected where the total amounts
appropriated are not required to perform these services and accomplish these purposes, and the
savings shall revert to the appropriate fund at the end of each fiscal year, except as otherwise
provided by law.

PART II. CURRENT OPERATIONS AND EXPANSION/GENERAL FUND

GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 2. Appropriations from the General Fund for the budgets of the State
departments, institutions, and agencies, and for other purposes as enumerated, are made for each
fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, in accordance with the provisions of this act.

PART III. HIGHWAY FUND AND HIGHWAY TRUST FUND

CURRENT OPERATIONS AND EXPANSION/HIGHWAY FUND
SECTION 3.1. Appropriations from the State Highway Fund for the maintenance
and operation of the Department of Transportation and for other purposes as enumerated are
made for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, in accordance with the provisions of
this act.

HIGHWAY TRUST FUND APPROPRIATIONS
*S258-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.2. Appropriations from the State Highway Trust Fund for the
maintenance and operation of the Department of Transportation and for other purposes as
enumerated are made for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, in accordance with
the provisions of this act.

PART IV. BLOCK GRANTS

DHHS BLOCK GRANTS
SECTION 4.1. Appropriations from federal block grant funds are made for each
fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, in accordance with the provisions of this act.

NER BLOCK GRANTS
SECTION 4.2. Appropriations from federal block grant funds are made for each
fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, in accordance with the provisions of this act.

PART V. MISCELLANEOUS

STATE BUDGET ACT APPLIES
SECTION 5.1. The provisions of the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the General
Statutes, are reenacted and shall remain in full force and effect and are incorporated in this act
by reference.

MOST TEXT APPLIES ONLY TO THE 2025-2027 FISCAL BIENNIUM
SECTION 5.2. Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate
an intention to have effects beyond the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this
act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium.

EFFECT OF HEADINGS
SECTION 5.3. The headings to the Parts, subparts, and sections of this act are a
convenience to the reader and are for reference only. The headings do not expand, limit, or define
the text of this act, except for effective dates referring to a Part or subpart.

SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 5.4. If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional or
invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any part other than
the part so declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5.5. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1,
2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 258-First Edition